North Carolina, session 2025, HB1169.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 10 of Article 3 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 20-140.6. Unlawful to operate motor vehicle while holding live animal in lap.
(a) Offense. – It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vehicle on a public street,
highway, or public vehicular area while holding a live animal in the person's lap.
(b) Penalty. – A violation of this section shall be an infraction and shall be punishable by
a fine of one hundred dollars ($100.00) and the costs of court.
(c) Points. – No drivers license points or insurance surcharge shall be assessed as a result
of a violation of this section.
(d) Negligence. – Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall not constitute
negligence per se or contributory negligence per se by the operator in any action for the recovery
of damages arising out of the operation, ownership, or maintenance of a vehicle."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to conduct a public awareness campaign regarding the
requirements of this act.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act is effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of this act
becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
*H1169-v-1*